Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Subchapter 8 Dissolution and Winding Up

386A.8-010.
Events causing dissolution.

A statutory trust is dissolved by:

Administrative dissolution under Subchapter 7 of KRS Chapter 14A;

The filing of articles of dissolution under KRS

386A.8-020

:

On the occurrence of an event or circumstance that the governing instrument states causes dissolution; or

With the approval of the beneficial owners;

Having no beneficial owners for ninety (90) days; or

Judicial dissolution in accordance with KRS

386A.8-030

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 64, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.8-020.
Articles of dissolution.

If dissolution of a statutory trust is authorized under KRS

386A.8-010

(2) or (3), the trust shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of dissolution setting forth:

The name of the trust; and

The date of the event or circumstance causing the dissolution.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

14A.2-070

, a statutory trust is dissolved when articles of dissolution that comply with subsection (1) of this section are filed by the Secretary of State.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 65, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.8-030.
Judicial dissolution.

The appropriate court may dissolve a statutory trust in a proceeding by a beneficial owner if it is established that:

It is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business of the statutory trust in conformity with the governing instrument; or

The trust has been without a trustee for ninety (90) days and no successor trustee has been appointed or designated in accordance with the governing agreement.

The clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree of dissolution to the Secretary of State, who shall file it. The dissolution shall be effective upon the latter of the date specified by the court or the filing of the decree of dissolution by the Secretary of State.

After entering the decree of dissolution, the appropriate court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the business and affairs of the statutory trust in accordance with KRS

386A.8-040

and

386A.8-050

and the notification of claimants in accordance with KRS

386A.8-060

and

386A.8-070

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 66, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.8-040.
Winding up.

After dissolution, a statutory trust continues its existence as a statutory trust, but may not carry on any activities except as is appropriate to wind up and liquidate its activities and affairs, including:

Collecting the assets of the trust;

Disposing of the properties of the trust that will not be distributed in kind to beneficial owners of the trust;

Discharging or making provision for discharging the liabilities of the trust, including entering into agreements with creditors for the satisfaction thereof;

Distributing the remaining property of the trust in accordance with KRS

386A.8-080

; and

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate the trust’s activities and affairs.

In winding up a statutory trust’s activities, a trust may:

Preserve the trust’s activities and property as a going concern for a reasonable time;

Prosecute, defend, or settle actions or proceedings whether civil, criminal, or administrative, including by mediation or arbitration; and

Transfer the property of the trust.

The dissolution of a statutory trust does not:

Prevent the commencement of a proceeding by or against the trust in its name;

Abate or suspend a proceeding by or against the trust pending on the effective date of dissolution;

Transfer title to the trust’s property;

Terminate the authority of the registered agent of the statutory trust;

Abate or suspend KRS

386A.3-040

; or

Abate or suspend KRS

386A.4-020

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 67, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.8-050.
Supervision of winding up and liquidation.

Subject to KRS

386A.8-030

(3), after dissolution of a statutory trust, the trustee or trustees shall wind up the trust’s activities.

The appropriate court may order judicial supervision of the winding up of a statutory trust, including the appointment of a person to wind up the trust’s activities:

On application of a beneficial owner, if the applicant establishes good cause; or

In connection with a proceeding under KRS

386A.8-030

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 68, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.8-060.
Known claims against dissolved trust.

Upon dissolution, a statutory trust may, and a series trust shall, dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedures described in this section.

The statutory trust shall notify its known claimants, as well as all known claimants of any series or against the assets of or associated with a series, in writing of the dissolution at any time after the effective date of dissolution. The written notice shall:

Provide the name of the trust and, if a series trust, the name under which each series has transacted business;

Describe the information that must be included in a claim;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date of the written notice, by which the trust must receive the claim; and

State that the claim against the trust, or in the case of a series trust a claim against a series or against the property of or associated with a series, will be barred if not received by the deadline.

A claim shall be barred:

If a claimant who is given written notice under subsection (2) of this section does not deliver the claim to the trust by the deadline; or

If a claimant whose claim was rejected by the trust does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within ninety (90) days after the date of the rejection notice.

For purposes of this section, “claim” shall not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 69, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.8-070.
Other claims against dissolved trust.

A statutory trust may, and a series trust shall, publish notice of its dissolution pursuant to this section.

The notice shall:

Be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the statutory trust’s principal office, or, if none in this Commonwealth, its registered office, is or was last located;

Provide the name of the statutory trust and, if a series statutory trust, the name or names under which each series has transacted business;

Describe the information that must be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the trust, or in the case of a series trust a claim against a series or against the property of or associated with a series, will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within two (2) years after the publication of the notice.

If the statutory trust publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, the claim of each of the following claimants shall be barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim within two (2) years after the publication date of the newspaper notice:

A claimant who did not receive written notice under KRS

386A.8-060

;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the trust but not acted on; and

A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

A claim may be enforced under this section:

Against the statutory trust, to the extent of the assets of the trust that remain undistributed;

To the extent of assets of the statutory trust that have been distributed in liquidation, against a beneficial owner to the extent of a pro rata share of the claim, but the total liability of a beneficial owner for all claims under this section shall not exceed the total assets of the statutory trust, or the assets of or associated with a series dissolved with the statutory trust, distributed in liquidation to the beneficial owner; and

For claims against a series or against the property of or associated with a series, as provided in KRS

386A.4-100

(4).

A statutory trust that published a notice under this section may file an application with the appropriate court for a determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payment of claims that are contingent or have not been made known to the trust or that are based on an event occurring after the effective date of the dissolution of the trust but that, based on the facts known to the trust, are reasonably estimated to arise after the effective date of the dissolution of the trust. Provision need not be made for any claim that is or is reasonably anticipated to be barred under subsection (3) of this section.

Within ten (10) days after the filing of the application provided for in subsection (5) of this section, notice of the proceeding shall be given by the statutory trust to each claimant described in KRS

386A.8-060

(2).

The appropriate court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown in any proceeding brought under this section, including those claimants whose claims are contingent or based upon an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution. The reasonable fees and expenses of the guardian, including all reasonable expert witness fees, shall be paid by the statutory trust.

Provision by the statutory trust for security in the amount and the form ordered by the appropriate court under subsection (5) of this section shall satisfy the trust’s obligation with respect to claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the trust, or are based on an event occurring after the effective date of the trust’s dissolution, and those claims may not be enforced against a beneficial owner to whom assets of the trust have been distributed.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 70, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.8-080.
Application of assets in winding up.

Upon the winding up of a statutory trust, the assets of the trust shall be distributed as follows:

First, payment or adequate provisions for payment shall be made to creditors, including, to the extent permitted by law, beneficial owners who are creditors in satisfaction of liabilities of the trust;

Second, unless otherwise provided in the governing instrument, to beneficial owners in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions declared but unpaid; and

Third, unless otherwise provided in the governing instrument, to beneficial owners in proportion to their respective rights to share in distributions from the trust prior to dissolution.

Upon the winding up of a series statutory trust, the assets of or associated with a series shall be distributed in accordance with KRS

386A.4-110

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 71, effective July 12, 2012.